Florida, session 2026, HB1135.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (136) is added to section 320.08058,
Florida Statutes, to read:
320.08058 Specialty license plates.—
(136) FLORIDA FILM LEGACY LICENSE PLATES.—
(a) The department shall develop a Florida Film Legacy
license plate as provided in this section and s. 320.08053. The
plate must bear the colors and design approved by the department
in consultation with Feature Florida Partnerships, Inc. The word
"Florida" must appear at the top of the plate, and the words
"Film Legacy" must appear at the bottom of the plate.
(b) The annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be
distributed to Feature Florida Partnerships, Inc., a nonprofit
corporation under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. By
September 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, Feature Florida
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1135-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1135 2026
Partnerships, Inc., must submit a financial report to the
department detailing the use of such fees during the preceding
fiscal year.
Section 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1135-00